Utah statutes.
32B-2-602.   Application requirements for a package agency.

(1)  Before a person may store, sell, offer for sale, or furnish liquor in a sealed container on its premises under a package agency, the person shall first obtain a package agency issued by the commission in accordance with this part.

(2)  To obtain a package agency, a person seeking to be the package agent under this part shall submit to the department:

(a)  a written application in a form prescribed by the department;

(b)  a nonrefundable application fee of $125;

(c)  written consent of the local authority;

(d)  evidence of proximity to any community location, with proximity requirements being governed by Section 32B-1-202;

(e)  a bond as specified by Section 32B-2-604;

(f)  a floor plan of the premises, including a description and highlighting of that part of the premises in which the person proposes that the package agency be located;

(g)  evidence that the package agency is carrying public liability insurance in an amount and form satisfactory to the department;

(h)  a signed consent form stating that the package agent permits any authorized representative of the commission, department, or any law enforcement officer to have unrestricted right to enter the premises of the package agency;

(i)  if the person applying is an entity, verification that a person who signs the package agency application is authorized to sign on behalf of the entity; and

(j)  any other information the commission or department may require.

(3)  The commission may not issue a package agency to a person who is disqualified under Section 32B-1-304.

(4)  The commission may not issue a package agency for premises that do not meet the proximity requirements of Section 32B-1-202.

